number.lexc
!
! One may want to be more restrictive with the percent sign, 
! but we accept anything, which makes sense for things like %200.
! It may also be good for generation to restrict the suffixes attached  
! after a percentage. On the other hand, for most cases, percent 
! sign will be tokenized separately.
! 
LEXICON NumPercent 
%<perc%>:%%@MB             NumPercentCont;

LEXICON NumPercentCont
<%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9>  FirstNum;


!
! Roman numerals
!
! also a bit ugly to do it here, but it is more convenient.
! We just try to recognize them, no trickery to convert them.
!
! We only recognize the modern notation, but we 
! additionally accept IIII.
!

LEXICON NumberRoman
< [M|D|C|L|X|V|I]+ .o.          ! make sure there is at least one character
  M*                            ! thousands
  (C [D|M] | (D) C^{0,3})       ! hundreds
  (X [L|C] | (L) X^{0,3})       ! tens
  (I [V|X] | (V) I^{0,3} | I^4) >           RomanStem;
! the following is exactly the same, but with special UNICODE characters
< [Ⅿ|Ⅾ|Ⅽ|Ⅼ|Ⅹ|Ⅴ|Ⅰ]+ .o.
  Ⅿ*
  (Ⅽ [Ⅾ|Ⅿ] | (Ⅾ) Ⅽ^{0,3})
  (Ⅹ [Ⅼ|Ⅽ] | (Ⅼ) Ⅹ^{0,3})
  (Ⅰ [Ⅴ|Ⅹ] | (Ⅴ) Ⅰ^{0,3} | Ⅰ^4) >           RomanStem;
!
! and lowercase versions, 
!
! TODO: maybe we should do this in morph-phon part
< [m|d|c|l|x|v|i]+ .o.
  m*
  (c [d|m] | (d) c^{0,3})
  (x [l|c] | (l) x^{0,3})
  (i [v|x] | (v) i^{0,3} | i^4) >           RomanStem;
! the following is exactly the same, but with lowercase characters
< [ⅿ|ⅾ|ⅽ|ⅼ|ⅹ|ⅴ|ⅰ]+ .o.
  ⅿ*
  (ⅽ [ⅾ|ⅿ] | (ⅾ) ⅽ^{0,3})
  (ⅹ [ⅼ|ⅽ] | (ⅼ) ⅹ^{0,3})
  (ⅰ [ⅴ|ⅹ] | (ⅴ) ⅰ^{0,3} | ⅰ^4) >           RomanStem;

! combined unicode characters
< Ⅰ|Ⅱ|Ⅲ|Ⅳ|Ⅴ|Ⅵ|Ⅶ|Ⅷ|Ⅸ|Ⅹ|Ⅺ|Ⅻ >                 RomanStem;
< ⅰ|ⅱ|ⅲ|ⅳ|ⅴ|ⅵ|ⅶ|ⅷ|ⅸ|ⅹ|ⅺ|ⅻ >                 RomanStem;

!
! Dates and times.
!
! This matches some common date/time formats.
! 24-hour like time format with either with `:' or `.' sepearators are
! accpted
! 
! Dates of (D)D/MM/YYYY format (also with `-' or `.' as
! separators) and YYYY-MM-DD are accepted. No month-first 
! (USA style) dates (yet).
!

LEXICON NumDateTime
< [[(%0) [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]]|
   [[1|2][%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]] ] 
   [%:|%.]
  [%0|1|2|3|4|5] [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] 
  ([%:|%.] [%0|1|2|3|4|5] [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]) > TimeStem;

< [[(%0) [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]]|
   [[1|2] [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]]|
   [3     [%0|1]]]
   [%/|%-|%.]
  [[(%0) [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]]|
   [1 [%0|1|2]] ]
   [%/|%-|%.]
  [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]^{1,4} >             DateStem;

< [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]^{1,4} 
   %-
  [[(%0) [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]]|
   [1 [%0|1|2]] ]
   %-
   [[(%0) [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]]|
   [[1|2] [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]]|
   [3     [%0|1]]] >                        DateStem;

% Trivial acceptor for fraction expressions like 1/4
LEXICON NumFraction
< [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]+
   %/
  [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]+ >                 NumericStem;
